Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-186
Vehicle identification inspections; revocation of certificate of training; procedure; appeal.

The patrol may, after notice and a hearing, revoke a certificate of training. The patrol shall only be required to hold a hearing if the hearing is requested in writing within fifteen days after notice of the proposed revocation is delivered by the patrol. The patrol may revoke a certificate of training for any reason for which an applicant may be denied approval for training pursuant to section 60-185. The patrol may revoke a certificate of training if the holder fails to keep a certificate current by taking any additional training the patrol may require. The patrol may revoke a certificate of training if the patrol finds that the holder is incompetent. A rebuttable presumption of incompetence shall arise from a finding by the patrol or a court of competent jurisdiction that the holder of a certificate of training has issued a statement of inspection for a stolen vehicle. Any person who feels himself or herself aggrieved by the patrol's decision to revoke a certificate may appeal such decision, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 86.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.